Utah statutes.
30-3-17.1.   Proceedings considered confidential -- Written evaluation by
counselor.
The petition for conciliation and all communications, verbal or written, from
the parties to the domestic relations counselors or other personnel of the
conciliation department in counseling or conciliation proceedings shall be
deemed to be made in official confidence within the meaning of Section
78B-1-137 and shall not be admissible or usable for any purpose in any divorce
hearing or other proceeding.  However, the marriage counselor may submit to
the appropriate court a written evaluation of the prospects or prognosis of a
particular marriage without divulging facts or revealing confidential
disclosures.
